North Dakota, session 69, HB1166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12-60.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12-60.1-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Closed" means subject to examination only by a clerk of court, a judge of the court, the
juvenile commission, a criminal justice agency, the defendant, the defendant's counsel, a
state's attorney, or any person upon written order of a judge of the court.
2. "Court record" includes:
a. Any document or information collected, received, or maintained by court personnel in
connection with a judicial proceeding;
b. Any index, calendar, docket, register of actions, official record of the proceedings, order,
decree, judgment, minute, and any information in a case management system created or
prepared by court personnel relating to a judicial proceeding; and
c. Information maintained by court personnel pertaining to the administration of the court or
clerk of court office and not associated with a particular case.
2.3. "Criminal justice agency" has the same meaning as in section 12-60-16.1.
4. "Criminal record" means court and prosecution records subject to sealing under this chapter. A
criminal record does not include criminal history record information as defined in subsection 5
of section 12-60-16.1 or criminal justice data information maintained in the criminal justice
data information sharing system under section 54-12-34.
3.5. "Prosecutor" means the office or agency with jurisdiction over the offense for purposes of
postconviction proceedings.
4.6. "Nonconviction" means dismissal of all criminal charges in a case or acquittal of all criminal
charges in a case.
7. "Seal" means to prohibit the disclosure of the existence or contents of court or prosecution
records unless authorized by court order.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 12-60.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

H. B. NO. 1166 - PAGE 2
12-60.1-02. Grounds to file petition to seal criminal record.
1. An individual may file a petition to seal a criminal record if:
a. The individual pled guilty to or was found guilty of a misdemeanor offense and the
individual has not been convicted of a new crime for at least three years before filing the
petition; or
b. The individual pled guilty to or was found guilty of a felony offense and the individual has
not been convicted of a new crime for at least five years before filing the petition; or
c. The individual was granted an unconditional pardon of the criminal conviction by the
governor.
2. This Except as provided under section 3 of this Act, this chapter does not apply to:
a. A felony offense involving violence or intimidation during the period in which the offender
is ineligible to possess a firearm under subdivision a of subsection 1 of section
62.1-02-01; or
b. An offense for which an offender has been ordered to register under section 12.1-32-15.
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 12-60.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Closing nonconviction records.
1. If a court enters an order of nonconviction on or after Augus t 1, 2025, the court shall close the
court record upon the expiration of sixty-one days.
2. The defendant may file a petition to the court to have the court record closed if the court
entered an order of nonconviction for a case disposed of before Augus t 1, 2025. If the
defendant meets the requirements of this section, the court shall enter an order closing the
court record within ten days of the petition being filed .
3. This section does not apply if:
a. The dismissal was the result of a plea agreement involving a conviction on another
offense;
b. The case was dismissed due to a finding the individual was not fit to proceed under
chapter 12.1 - 04 ;
c. The case resulted in a verdict of not guilty due to a lack of criminal responsibility under
chapter 12.1 - 04.1; or
d. The case was appealed.
4. A filing fee may not be charged for a petition filed under this section.

H. B. NO. 1166 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1166.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 1 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State